fr: Type de réglage: Carrossage réglable; Amortissement réglable (rebond/compression); Non réglable; Hauteur de caisse et amortissement réglables; Hauteur de caisse réglable; Autre
zh-TW: 可調式類型: 可調外傾角; 阻尼可調 (回彈/壓縮); 不可調; 車身高度 + 阻尼可調; 車身高度可調; 其他
fi: Säädettävyystyyppi: Camber-säätö; Iskunvaimennus säädettävissä (paluu/puristus); Ei säädettävä; Ajokorkeus + iskunvaimennus säädettävissä; Ajokorkeus säädettävissä; Muu
es: Tipo de capacidad de ajuste: Camber ajustable; Amortiguación ajustable (rebote/compresión); No ajustable; Altura de manejo y amortiguación ajustables; Altura de manejo ajustable; Otro
lt-LT: Reguliavimo tipas: Reguliuojamas išvirtimas; Reguliuojamas slopinimas (atšokimas / suspaudimas); Nereguliuojamas; Reguliuojamas važiavimo aukštis ir slopinimas; Reguliuojamas važiavimo aukštis; Kita
tr: Ayarlanabilirlik türü: Kamber ayarlı; Sönümleme ayarlı (sekme/sıkışma); Ayarlanamaz; Sürüş yüksekliği + sönümleme ayarlı; Sürüş yüksekliği ayarlı; Diğer
ru: Тип регулировки: С регулировкой развала; С регулировкой демпфирования (отбой/сжатие); Нерегулируемый; С регулировкой дорожного просвета и демпфирования; С регулировкой дорожного просвета; Другое
da: Justeringstype: Justerbar camber; Justerbar dæmpning (rebound/kompression); Ikke-justerbar; Justerbar kørehøjde og dæmpning; Justerbar kørehøjde; Anden
ko: 조절 방식: 캠버 조절 가능; 댐핑 조절 가능(리바운드/압축); 조절 불가; 차고 + 댐핑 조절 가능; 차고 조절 가능; 기타
hu: Állíthatóság típusa: Állítható dőlésszögű; Állítható csillapítású (visszaút/nyomás); Nem állítható; Állítható hasmagasság és csillapítás; Állítható hasmagasságú; Egyéb
zh-CN: 可调节类型: 外倾角可调; 阻尼可调（回弹/压缩）; 不可调; 底盘高度 + 阻尼可调; 底盘高度可调; 其他
ja: 調整タイプ: キャンバー調整可能; 減衰力調整可能 (リバウンド/コンプレッション); 調整不可; 車高+減衰力調整可能; 車高調整可能; その他
sk-SK: Typ nastaviteľnosti: Nastaviteľný odklon kolesa; Nastaviteľné tlmenie (odskok/kompresia); Nenastaviteľné; Nastaviteľná svetlá výška a tlmenie; Nastaviteľná svetlá výška; Iné
bg-BG: Тип регулируемост: Регулируем наклон (камбър); Регулируемо амортизиране (отскок/свиване); Нерегулируем; Регулируема височина на возене + амортизиране; Регулируема височина на возене; Други
vi: Loại khả năng điều chỉnh: Có thể điều chỉnh góc camber; Có thể điều chỉnh giảm chấn (độ nảy/độ nén); Không thể điều chỉnh; Khoảng sáng gầm + điều chỉnh giảm chấn; Khoảng sáng gầm có thể điều chỉnh; Khác
el: Τύπος δυνατότητας προσαρμογής: Ρυθμιζόμενο κάμπερ (camber); Ρυθμιζόμενη απόσβεση (επαναφορά/συμπίεση); Μη ρυθμιζόμενο; Ρυθμιζόμενο ύψος οχήματος + απόσβεση; Ρυθμιζόμενο ύψος οχήματος; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de ajustabilidade: Camber ajustável; Amortecimento ajustável (ressalto/compressão); Não ajustável; Altura ao solo + amortecimento ajustáveis; Altura ao solo ajustável; Outro
de: Art der Verstellbarkeit: Sturz einstellbar; Dämpfung einstellbar (Zug-/Druckstufe); Nicht einstellbar; Fahrhöhe + Dämpfung einstellbar; Fahrhöhe einstellbar; Andere
cs: Typ nastavitelnosti: Nastavitelný odklon kol; Nastavitelné tlumení (odskok/komprese); Nenastavitelné; Nastavitelná světlá výška a tlumení; Nastavitelná světlá výška; Ostatní
sl-SI: Vrsta prilagodljivosti: Nastavljiv previs; Nastavljivo blaženje (razteg/stisk); Nenastavljivo; Nastavljiva višina vožnje in blaženje; Nastavljiva višina vožnje; Drugo
th: ประเภทการปรับตั้ง: ปรับมุมแคมเบอร์ได้; ปรับความหนืดได้ (รีบาวด์/คอมเพรสชัน); ปรับไม่ได้; ปรับความสูงรถ + ความหนืดได้; ปรับความสูงรถได้; อื่นๆ
pl: Typ regulacji: Regulacja kąta pochylenia kół (camber); Regulacja tłumienia (odbicie/dobicie); Brak regulacji; Regulacja wysokości i tłumienia; Regulacja wysokości; Inne
sv: Justerbarhetstyp: Justerbar camber; Justerbar dämpning (retur/kompression); Ej justerbar; Justerbar höjd + dämpning; Justerbar höjd; Övrigt
pt-BR: Tipo de ajustabilidade: Cambagem ajustável; Amortecimento ajustável (retorno/compressão); Não ajustável; Altura da suspensão + amortecimento ajustáveis; Altura da suspensão ajustável; Outros
nl: Type verstelbaarheid: Camber verstelbaar; Demping verstelbaar (rebound/compressie); Niet-verstelbaar; Rijhoogte en demping verstelbaar; Rijhoogte verstelbaar; Overig
hr-HR: Vrsta prilagodljivosti: Podesivi nagib kotača; Podesivo prigušenje (odskok/kompresija); Nepodesivo; Podesiva visina vožnje i prigušenje; Podesiva visina vožnje; Ostalo
nb: Justeringstype: Justerbar camber; Justerbar demping (retur/kompresjon); Ikke-justerbar; Justerbar høyde og demping; Justerbar høyde; Annet
ro-RO: Tip de ajustabilitate: Unghi de cădere ajustabil; Amortizare ajustabilă (revenire/compresie); Neajustabil; Înălțime de rulare + amortizare ajustabilă; Înălțime de rulare ajustabilă; Altele
it: Tipo di regolabilità: Camber regolabile; Ammortizzazione regolabile (estensione/compressione); Non regolabile; Altezza da terra + ammortizzazione regolabile; Altezza da terra regolabile; Altro
en: Adjustability type: Camber adjustable; Damping adjustable (rebound/compression); Non-adjustable; Ride height + damping adjustable; Ride height adjustable; Other